Massachusetts, session 194th, S1582.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4M½ of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof
the following subsection:-
(b) Every person over the age of 18 who receives health care services from a primary care
provider shall be offered a hepatitis C screening test or a hepatitis C diagnostic test unless the
provider believes that: (i) the person is being treated for a life threatening emergency; (ii) the
person has previously been offered or has received a hepatitis screening test; or (iii) the person
lacks capacity to consent to a hepatitis C screening test.
SECTION 2. Said section 4M½ is hereby further amended by adding the following
subsection:-
of 2

(c) The department shall promulgate, and from time to time revise, regulations
establishing the hepatitis C screening or hepatitis C diagnostic test requirements under subsection
(b), including but not limited to the frequency with which a primary care provider must offer a
hepatitis C screening test or hepatitis C diagnostic test.
SECTION 3. The department shall promulgate regulations required under section 2 not
later than 180 days following the effective date of this act.
of 2